Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.475

Gender equity—Construction—1989 c 340.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to excuse any institution from any more stringent requirement to achieve gender equity imposed by law, nor to permit any institution to decrease participation of any underrepresented gender class.

[ 1989 c 340 s 7.]